pt-BR: Tipo de grade: Espesso; Extra grosso; Extra fino; Ralo; Médio; Superfino; Ultrafino; Muito fino; Outro
ja: 粒度タイプ: 硬毛; 超粗目; 極細; ファイン; 媒体; 超微細; 極細; 非常に細かい; その他
nb: Korntype: Grovt; Ekstra grovt; Ekstra fint; Tynn; Middels; Superfint; Ultrafint; Veldig fint; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta granulacije: Krupni; Ekstra krupni; Ekstra sitni; Sitni; Srednji; Posebno sitni; Iznimno sitni; Vrlo sitni; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de lixa: Áspero; Extra áspero; Extra fino; Fina; Médio; Super fino; Ultrafino; Muito fino; Outro
en: Grit type: Coarse; Extra coarse; Extra fine; Fine; Medium; Super fine; Ultra fine; Very fine; Other
vi: Loại hạt đá: Tóc thô; Cực thô; Cực mịn; Mảnh; Vừa; Siêu mịn; Siêu cấp mịn; Rất mịn; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta zrnatosti: Grobo; Zelo groba; Zelo fina; Fino; Srednja; Super fina; Izjemno fina; Zelo fina; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип зърненост на абразива: Груб; Изключително груб; Изключително фин; Фин; Среден; Супер фин; Изключително фин; Много фин; Други
hu: Szemcsésség típusa: Durva; Extra durva; Extra finom; Finom; Közepes; Szuper finom; Ultra finom; Nagyon finom; Egyéb
lt-LT: Rupumas: Rupus; Itin rupus; Itin smulkus; Smulkus; Vidutinis; Supersmulkus; Ultrasmulkus; Labai smulkus; Kita
de: Körnungstyp: Grob; Extra grob; Extra fein; Fein; Medium; Super fein; Ultrafein; Sehr fein; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 砂粒類型: 濃密; 特粗; 特細; 細; 媒介; 超細; 極細; 非常細; 其他
sv: Kornstorlek: Tjockt; Extra grov; Extra fin; Fint; Medium; Superfin; Ultrafin; Mycket fin; Övrigt
it: Tipo di grana: Grosso; Extra grosso; Extra fine; Fine; Medio; Super fine; Ultra fine; Molto fine; Altro
ro-RO: Tip granulație: Grosieră; Foarte grosieră; Foarte fină; Fină; Medie; Super fină; Ultra fină; Foarte fină; Altele
zh-CN: 砂砾类型: 粗发丝; 特粗; 特细; 细; 媒介; 超细; 极细; 非常细; 其他
th: ประเภทกรวด: ผมหยาบ; หยาบมาก; ละเอียดพิเศษ; บาง; สื่อ; ละเอียดสูง; ละเอียดสูงสุด; ละเอียดมาก; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ żwiru: Filtr zgrubny; Bardzo gruboziarnisty; Bardzo drobny; Dobre; Środek; Super drobny; Ultra drobny; Bardzo drobny; Inne
fi: Hiekkatyyppi: Karkeat; Erittäin karkea; Extrahieno; Ohut; Keskimääräinen; Superhieno; Ultrahieno; Erittäin hieno; Muu
cs: Typ zrnitosti: Hrubé; Extra hrubý; Extra jemný; Jemný; Médium; Super jemný; Ultra jemný; Velmi jemný; Jiné
tr: Kum Tipi: Kalın; Ekstra kalın; Ekstra ince; İnce; Orta; Süper ince; Ultra ince; Çok ince; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ zrnitosti: Hrubý; Extra hrubý; Extra jemný; Jemný; Stredný; Super jemný; Ultra jemný; Veľmi jemný; Iné
fr: Type de grain: Épais; Extra corsé; Extra fin; Fin; Moyen; Super fin; Ultra fin; Très fin; Autre
ru: Уровень зернистости: Крупный; Очень крупный; Очень мелкий; Мелкий; Средний; Супермелкий; Ультрамелкий; Очень мелкий; Другое
ko: 그릿 유형: 거친; 매우 거친; 매우 고운; 파인; 매체; 매우 미세; 초미세; 아주 고운; 기타
da: Korntype: Groft; Ekstra groft; Ekstra fint; Fin; Medium; Super fint; Ultra fint; Meget fint; Andet
nl: Grittype: Grof; Extra grof; Extra fijn; Fijn; Medium; Superfijn; Ultrafijn; Zeer fijn; Andere
es: Tipo de grano: Grueso; Extragrueso; Extrafino; Fino; Medio; Muy fino; Ultrafino; Muy fino; Otros
el: Τύπος τραχύτητας: Τραχιές; Εξαιρετικά χοντρό; Εξαιρετικά λεπτό; Λεπτές; Μέση; Σούπερ λεπτό; Εξαιρετικά λεπτό; Πολύ λεπτό; Άλλο